Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2812
Process; provisions applicable.

(1) The process for selecting a design-builder and entering into a design-build contract shall be in accordance with sections 39-2813 to 39-2816.

(2) Except as otherwise specifically provided in the Transportation Innovation Act, the process for selecting a progressive design-builder and entering into a progressive design-build contract shall be in accordance with sections 39-2813 to 39-2816.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 12;

Laws 2022, LB1016, § 6.